Illinois, session 104th, SB2027.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Sections 53-55 and 3-61 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/3-55)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.3-55)7    Sec. 3-55. Multistate exemption. To prevent actual or 8likely multistate taxation, the tax imposed by this Act does 9not apply to the use of tangible personal property in this 10State under the following circumstances:11    (a) The use, in this State, of tangible personal property 12acquired outside this State by a nonresident individual and 13brought into this State by the individual for his or her own 14use while temporarily within this State or while passing 15through this State.16    (b) (Blank).17    (c) The use, in this State, by owners or lessors, lessees, 18or shippers of tangible personal property that is utilized by 19interstate carriers for hire for use as rolling stock moving 20in interstate commerce as long as so used by the interstate 21carriers for hire, and equipment operated by a 22telecommunications provider, licensed as a common carrier by 23the Federal Communications Commission, which is permanently   SB2027- 2 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1installed in or affixed to aircraft moving in interstate 2commerce.3    (d) The use, in this State, of tangible personal property 4that is acquired outside this State and caused to be brought 5into this State by a person who has already paid a tax in 6another State in respect to the sale, purchase, or use of that 7property, to the extent of the amount of the tax properly due 8and paid in the other State.9    (e) The temporary storage, in this State, of tangible 10personal property that is acquired outside this State and 11that, after being brought into this State and stored here 12temporarily, is used solely outside this State or is 13physically attached to or incorporated into other tangible 14personal property that is used solely outside this State, or 15is altered by converting, fabricating, manufacturing, 16printing, processing, or shaping, and, as altered, is used 17solely outside this State.18    (f) The temporary storage in this State of building 19materials and fixtures that are acquired either in this State 20or outside this State by an Illinois registered combination 21retailer and construction contractor, and that the purchaser 22thereafter uses outside this State by incorporating that 23property into real estate located outside this State.24    (g) The use or purchase of tangible personal property by a 25common carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 26possession of the property in Illinois, and that transports   SB2027- 3 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 2transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a standard 3uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the property as 4the shipper or consignor of the property to a destination 5outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.6    (h) Except as provided in subsections subsection (h-1) and 7(h-1.5), the use, in this State, of a motor vehicle that was 8sold in this State to a nonresident, even though the motor 9vehicle is delivered to the nonresident in this State, if the 10motor vehicle is not to be titled in this State, and if a 11drive-away permit is issued to the motor vehicle as provided 12in Section 3-603 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or if the 13nonresident purchaser has vehicle registration plates to 14transfer to the motor vehicle upon returning to his or her home 15state. The issuance of the drive-away permit or having the 16out-of-state registration plates to be transferred shall be 17prima facie evidence that the motor vehicle will not be titled 18in this State.19    (h-1) The exemption under subsection (h) does not apply if 20the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does not 21allow a reciprocal exemption for the use in that state of a 22motor vehicle sold and delivered in that state to an Illinois 23resident but titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this 24Act on the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident 25of another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption 26shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax on   SB2027- 4 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is a 2resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax that 3would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the time of the 4sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, signed under 5penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to title the vehicle 6in the state in which the purchaser is a resident within 30 7days after the sale and of the fact of the payment to the State 8of Illinois of tax in an amount equivalent to the state's rate 9of tax on taxable property in his or her state of residence and 10shall submit the statement to the appropriate tax collection 11agency in his or her state of residence. In addition, the 12retailer must retain a signed copy of the statement in his or 13her records. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 14require the removal of the vehicle from this state following 15the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in the purchaser's 16state of residence if the purchaser titles the vehicle in his 17or her state of residence within 30 days after the date of 18sale. The tax collected under this Act in accordance with this 19subsection (h-1) shall be proportionately distributed as if 20the tax were collected at the 6.25% general rate imposed under 21this Act. 22    (h-1.5) There is a rebuttable presumption that the 23exemption under subsection (h) does not apply if the purchaser 24is a limited liability company and a member of the limited 25liability company is a resident of Illinois. This presumption 26may be rebutted by other evidence, such as evidence the motor   SB2027- 5 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1vehicle is insured for primary use at an address outside of 2Illinois or evidence that the motor vehicle will be stored or 3garaged at a physical address outside Illinois. 4    (h-2) The following exemptions apply with respect to 5certain aircraft:6        (1) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed under 7    this Act on the purchase of an aircraft, as defined in 8    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 9    following conditions are met:10            (A) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 11        after the later of either the issuance of the final 12        billing for the purchase of the aircraft or the 13        authorized approval for return to service, completion 14        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 15        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 16        required by 14 C.F.R. 91.407;17            (B) the aircraft is not based or registered in 18        this State after the purchase of the aircraft; and19            (C) the purchaser provides the Department with a 20        signed and dated certification, on a form prescribed 21        by the Department, certifying that the requirements of 22        this item (1) are met. The certificate must also 23        include the name and address of the purchaser, the 24        address of the location where the aircraft is to be 25        titled or registered, the address of the primary 26        physical location of the aircraft, and other   SB2027- 6 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1        information that the Department may reasonably 2        require.3        (2) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed under 4    this Act on the use of an aircraft, as defined in Section 3 5    of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, that is temporarily 6    located in this State for the purpose of a prepurchase 7    evaluation if all of the following conditions are met:8            (A) the aircraft is not based or registered in 9        this State after the prepurchase evaluation; and10            (B) the purchaser provides the Department with a 11        signed and dated certification, on a form prescribed 12        by the Department, certifying that the requirements of 13        this item (2) are met. The certificate must also 14        include the name and address of the purchaser, the 15        address of the location where the aircraft is to be 16        titled or registered, the address of the primary 17        physical location of the aircraft, and other 18        information that the Department may reasonably 19        require.20        (3) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed under 21    this Act on the use of an aircraft, as defined in Section 3 22    of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, that is temporarily 23    located in this State for the purpose of a post-sale 24    customization if all of the following conditions are met:25            (A) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 26        after the authorized approval for return to service,   SB2027- 7 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1        completion of the maintenance record entry, and 2        completion of the test flight and ground test for 3        inspection, as required by 14 C.F.R. 91.407;4            (B) the aircraft is not based or registered in 5        this State either before or after the post-sale 6        customization; and7            (C) the purchaser provides the Department with a 8        signed and dated certification, on a form prescribed 9        by the Department, certifying that the requirements of 10        this item (3) are met. The certificate must also 11        include the name and address of the purchaser, the 12        address of the location where the aircraft is to be 13        titled or registered, the address of the primary 14        physical location of the aircraft, and other 15        information that the Department may reasonably 16        require.17    If tax becomes due under this subsection (h-2) because of 18the purchaser's use of the aircraft in this State, the 19purchaser shall file a return with the Department and pay the 20tax on the fair market value of the aircraft. This return and 21payment of the tax must be made no later than 30 days after the 22aircraft is used in a taxable manner in this State. The tax is 23based on the fair market value of the aircraft on the date that 24it is first used in a taxable manner in this State.25    For purposes of this subsection (h-2):26    "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or otherwise   SB2027- 8 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1used, excluding post-sale customizations as defined in this 2Section, for 10 or more days in each 12-month period 3immediately following the date of the sale of the aircraft.4    "Post-sale customization" means any improvement, 5maintenance, or repair that is performed on an aircraft 6following a transfer of ownership of the aircraft.7    "Prepurchase evaluation" means an examination of an 8aircraft to provide a potential purchaser with information 9relevant to the potential purchase.10    "Registered in this State" means an aircraft registered 11with the Department of Transportation, Aeronautics Division, 12or titled or registered with the Federal Aviation 13Administration to an address located in this State. 14    This subsection (h-2) is exempt from the provisions of 15Section 3-90. 16    (i) Beginning July 1, 1999, the use, in this State, of fuel 17acquired outside this State and brought into this State in the 18fuel supply tanks of locomotives engaged in freight hauling 19and passenger service for interstate commerce. This subsection 20is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.21    (j) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 222016, the use of tangible personal property purchased from an 23Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 24purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of 25the property in Illinois, temporarily store the property in 26Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently transporting it   SB2027- 9 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1outside this State for use or consumption thereafter solely 2outside this State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, 3fabricated, or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated 4into other tangible personal property to be transported 5outside this State and thereafter used or consumed solely 6outside this State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to 7rules adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 8Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 9with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 10this subsection (j). The permit issued under this subsection 11(j) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the manner 12specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to purchase 13tangible personal property from a retailer exempt from the 14taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain all 15necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 16consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 17the State of Illinois.18(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25.) 19    (35 ILCS 105/3-61)20    Sec. 3-61. Motor vehicles; trailers; use as rolling stock 21definition. 22    (a) (Blank). 23    (b) (Blank).24    (c) This subsection (c) applies to motor vehicles, other 25than limousines, purchased through June 30, 2017. For motor   SB2027- 10 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1vehicles, other than limousines, purchased on or after July 1, 22017, subsection (d-5) applies. This subsection (c) applies to 3limousines purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017. "Use 4as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph 5(c) of Section 3-55 occurs for motor vehicles, as defined in 6Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when during a 712-month period the rolling stock has carried persons or 8property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 50% 9of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% of 10its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 11exemption shall make an election at the time of purchase to use 12either the trips or mileage method. Persons who purchased 13motor vehicles prior to July 1, 2004 shall make an election to 14use either the trips or mileage method and document that 15election in their books and records. If no election is made 16under this subsection to use the trips or mileage method, the 17person shall be deemed to have chosen the mileage method.18    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 19motor vehicles that carry persons or property for hire, even 20just between points in Illinois, will be considered used for 21hire in interstate commerce if the motor vehicle transports 22persons whose journeys or property whose shipments originate 23or terminate outside Illinois. The exemption for motor 24vehicles used as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 25may be claimed only for the following vehicles: (i) motor 26vehicles whose gross vehicle weight rating exceeds 16,000   SB2027- 11 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1pounds; and (ii) limousines, as defined in Section 1-139.1 of 2the Illinois Vehicle Code. On and after July 1, 2025, the 3exemption for limousines applies only to limousines that are 4not subject to the provisions of the Transportation Network 5Providers Act. Through June 30, 2017, this definition applies 6to all property purchased for the purpose of being attached to 7those motor vehicles as a part thereof. On and after July 1, 82017, this definition applies to property purchased for the 9purpose of being attached to limousines as a part thereof. For 10property that is purchased on or after July 1, 2025 for the 11purpose of being attached to a limousines as a part thereof, 12this definition applies only if the limousine is not subject 13to the provisions of the Transportation Network Providers Act. 14    (d) For purchases made through June 30, 2017, "use as 15rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph (c) 16of Section 3-55 occurs for trailers, as defined in Section 171-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, semitrailers as defined in 18Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and pole trailers 19as defined in Section 1-161 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when 20during a 12-month period the rolling stock has carried persons 21or property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 2250% of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% 23of its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 24exemption for a trailer or trailers that will not be dedicated 25to a motor vehicle or group of motor vehicles shall make an 26election at the time of purchase to use either the trips or   SB2027- 12 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1mileage method. Persons who purchased trailers prior to July 21, 2004 that are not dedicated to a motor vehicle or group of 3motor vehicles shall make an election to use either the trips 4or mileage method and document that election in their books 5and records. If no election is made under this subsection to 6use the trips or mileage method, the person shall be deemed to 7have chosen the mileage method.8    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 9trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that carry property 10for hire, even just between points in Illinois, will be 11considered used for hire in interstate commerce if the 12trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers transport property 13whose shipments originate or terminate outside Illinois. This 14definition applies to all property purchased for the purpose 15of being attached to those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 16trailers as a part thereof. In lieu of a person providing 17documentation regarding the qualifying use of each individual 18trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, that person may 19document such qualifying use by providing documentation of the 20following:21        (1) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 22    dedicated to a motor vehicle that qualifies as rolling 23    stock moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) 24    of this Section, then that trailer, semitrailer, or pole 25    trailer qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 26    commerce under this subsection.  SB2027- 13 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1        (2) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 2    dedicated to a group of motor vehicles that all qualify as 3    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 4    subsection (c) of this Section, then that trailer, 5    semitrailer, or pole trailer qualifies as rolling stock 6    moving in interstate commerce under this subsection.7        (3) If one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 8    trailers are dedicated to a group of motor vehicles and 9    not all of those motor vehicles in that group qualify as 10    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 11    subsection (c) of this Section, then the percentage of 12    those trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that 13    qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 14    under this subsection is equal to the percentage of those 15    motor vehicles in that group that qualify as rolling stock 16    moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) of this 17    Section to which those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 18    trailers are dedicated. However, to determine the 19    qualification for the exemption provided under this item 20    (3), the mathematical application of the qualifying 21    percentage to one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 22    trailers under this subpart shall not be allowed as to any 23    fraction of a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer. 24    (d-5) For motor vehicles and trailers purchased on or 25after July 1, 2017, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate 26commerce" means that:  SB2027- 14 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1        (1) the motor vehicle or trailer is used to transport 2    persons or property for hire;3        (2) for purposes of the exemption under subsection (c) 4    of Section 3-55, the purchaser who is an owner, lessor, or 5    shipper claiming the exemption certifies that the motor 6    vehicle or trailer will be utilized, from the time of 7    purchase and continuing through the statute of limitations 8    for issuing a notice of tax liability under this Act, by an 9    interstate carrier or carriers for hire who hold, and are 10    required by Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration 11    regulations to hold, an active USDOT Number with the 12    Carrier Operation listed as "Interstate" and the Operation 13    Classification listed as "authorized for hire", "exempt 14    for hire", or both "authorized for hire" and "exempt for 15    hire"; except that this paragraph (2) does not apply to a 16    motor vehicle or trailer used at an airport to support the 17    operation of an aircraft moving in interstate commerce, as 18    long as (i) in the case of a motor vehicle, the motor 19    vehicle meets paragraphs (1) and (3) of this subsection 20    (d-5) or (ii) in the case of a trailer, the trailer meets 21    paragraph (1) of this subsection (d-5); and22        (3) for motor vehicles, the gross vehicle weight 23    rating exceeds 16,000 pounds.24    The definition of "use as rolling stock moving in 25interstate commerce" in this subsection (d-5) applies to all 26property purchased on or after July 1, 2017 for the purpose of   SB2027- 15 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1being attached to a motor vehicle or trailer as a part thereof, 2regardless of whether the motor vehicle or trailer was 3purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017.4    If an item ceases to meet requirements (1) through (3) 5under this subsection (d-5), then the tax is imposed on the 6selling price, allowing for a reasonable depreciation for the 7period during which the item qualified for the exemption.8    For purposes of this subsection (d-5):9        "Motor vehicle" excludes limousines, but otherwise 10    means that term as defined in Section 1-146 of the 11    Illinois Vehicle Code.12        "Trailer" means (i) "trailer", as defined in Section 13    1-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, (ii) "semitrailer", as 14    defined in Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and 15    (iii) "pole trailer", as defined in Section 1-161 of the 16    Illinois Vehicle Code. 17    (e) For aircraft and watercraft purchased on or after 18January 1, 2014, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate 19commerce" in paragraph (c) of Section 3-55 occurs when, during 20a 12-month period, the rolling stock has carried persons or 21property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 50% 22of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% of 23its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 24exemption shall make an election at the time of purchase to use 25either the trips or mileage method and document that election 26in their books and records. If no election is made under this   SB2027- 16 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1subsection to use the trips or mileage method, the person 2shall be deemed to have chosen the mileage method. For 3aircraft, flight hours may be used in lieu of recording miles 4in determining whether the aircraft meets the mileage test in 5this subsection. For watercraft, nautical miles or trip hours 6may be used in lieu of recording miles in determining whether 7the watercraft meets the mileage test in this subsection.8    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 9contrary, property purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for 10the purpose of being attached to aircraft or watercraft as a 11part thereof qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 12commerce only if the aircraft or watercraft to which it will be 13attached qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 14commerce under the test set forth in this subsection (e), 15regardless of when the aircraft or watercraft was purchased. 16Persons who purchased aircraft or watercraft prior to January 171, 2014 shall make an election to use either the trips or 18mileage method and document that election in their books and 19records for the purpose of determining whether property 20purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for the purpose of being 21attached to aircraft or watercraft as a part thereof qualifies 22as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under this 23subsection (e). 24    (f) The election to use either the trips or mileage method 25made under the provisions of subsections (c), (d), or (e) of 26this Section will remain in effect for the duration of the   SB2027- 17 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1purchaser's ownership of that item. 2(Source: P.A. 100-321, eff. 8-24-17.) 3    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 4Section 3-51 as follows: 5    (35 ILCS 110/3-51)6    Sec. 3-51. Motor vehicles; trailers; use as rolling stock 7definition. 8    (a) (Blank). 9    (b) (Blank).10    (c) This subsection (c) applies to motor vehicles, other 11than limousines, purchased through June 30, 2017. For motor 12vehicles, other than limousines, purchased on or after July 1, 132017, subsection (d-5) applies. This subsection (c) applies to 14limousines purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017. "Use 15as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph 16(4a) of the definition of "sale of service" in Section 2 and 17subsection (b) of Section 3-45 occurs for motor vehicles, as 18defined in Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when 19during a 12-month period the rolling stock has carried persons 20or property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 2150% of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% 22of its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 23exemption shall make an election at the time of purchase to use 24either the trips or mileage method. Persons who purchased   SB2027- 18 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1motor vehicles prior to July 1, 2004 shall make an election to 2use either the trips or mileage method and document that 3election in their books and records. If no election is made 4under this subsection to use the trips or mileage method, the 5person shall be deemed to have chosen the mileage method.6    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 7motor vehicles that carry persons or property for hire, even 8just between points in Illinois, will be considered used for 9hire in interstate commerce if the motor vehicle transports 10persons whose journeys or property whose shipments originate 11or terminate outside Illinois. The exemption for motor 12vehicles used as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 13may be claimed only for the following vehicles: (i) motor 14vehicles whose gross vehicle weight rating exceeds 16,000 15pounds; and (ii) limousines, as defined in Section 1-139.1 of 16the Illinois Vehicle Code. On and after July 1, 2025, the 17exemption for limousines applies only to limousines that are 18not subject to the provisions of the Transportation Network 19Providers Act. Through June 30, 2017, this definition applies 20to all property purchased for the purpose of being attached to 21those motor vehicles as a part thereof. On and after July 1, 222017, this definition applies to property purchased for the 23purpose of being attached to limousines as a part thereof. 24With respect to property that is transferred incident to a 25sale of service on or after July 1, 2025 for the purpose of 26being attached to limousines as a part thereof, this   SB2027- 19 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1definition applies only if the limousine is not subject to the 2provisions of the Transportation Network Providers Act. 3    (d) For purchases made through June 30, 2017, "use as 4rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph (4a) 5of the definition of "sale of service" in Section 2 and 6subsection (b) of Section 3-45 occurs for trailers, as defined 7in Section 1-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, semitrailers as 8defined in Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and 9pole trailers as defined in Section 1-161 of the Illinois 10Vehicle Code, when during a 12-month period the rolling stock 11has carried persons or property for hire in interstate 12commerce for greater than 50% of its total trips for that 13period or for greater than 50% of its total miles for that 14period. The person claiming the exemption for a trailer or 15trailers that will not be dedicated to a motor vehicle or group 16of motor vehicles shall make an election at the time of 17purchase to use either the trips or mileage method. Persons 18who purchased trailers prior to July 1, 2004 that are not 19dedicated to a motor vehicle or group of motor vehicles shall 20make an election to use either the trips or mileage method and 21document that election in their books and records. If no 22election is made under this subsection to use the trips or 23mileage method, the person shall be deemed to have chosen the 24mileage method.25    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 26trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that carry property   SB2027- 20 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1for hire, even just between points in Illinois, will be 2considered used for hire in interstate commerce if the 3trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers transport property 4whose shipments originate or terminate outside Illinois. This 5definition applies to all property purchased for the purpose 6of being attached to those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 7trailers as a part thereof. In lieu of a person providing 8documentation regarding the qualifying use of each individual 9trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, that person may 10document such qualifying use by providing documentation of the 11following:12        (1) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 13    dedicated to a motor vehicle that qualifies as rolling 14    stock moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) 15    of this Section, then that trailer, semitrailer, or pole 16    trailer qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 17    commerce under this subsection.18        (2) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 19    dedicated to a group of motor vehicles that all qualify as 20    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 21    subsection (c) of this Section, then that trailer, 22    semitrailer, or pole trailer qualifies as rolling stock 23    moving in interstate commerce under this subsection.24        (3) If one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 25    trailers are dedicated to a group of motor vehicles and 26    not all of those motor vehicles in that group qualify as   SB2027- 21 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 2    subsection (c) of this Section, then the percentage of 3    those trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that 4    qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 5    under this subsection is equal to the percentage of those 6    motor vehicles in that group that qualify as rolling stock 7    moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) of this 8    Section to which those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 9    trailers are dedicated. However, to determine the 10    qualification for the exemption provided under this item 11    (3), the mathematical application of the qualifying 12    percentage to one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 13    trailers under this subpart shall not be allowed as to any 14    fraction of a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer. 15    (d-5) For motor vehicles and trailers purchased on or 16after July 1, 2017, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate 17commerce" means that:18        (1) the motor vehicle or trailer is used to transport 19    persons or property for hire;20        (2) for purposes of the exemption under paragraph (4a) 21    of the definition of "sale of service" in Section 2, the 22    purchaser who is an owner, lessor, or shipper claiming the 23    exemption certifies that the motor vehicle or trailer will 24    be utilized, from the time of purchase and continuing 25    through the statute of limitations for issuing a notice of 26    tax liability under this Act, by an interstate carrier or   SB2027- 22 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    carriers for hire who hold, and are required by Federal 2    Motor Carrier Safety Administration regulations to hold, 3    an active USDOT Number with the Carrier Operation listed 4    as "Interstate" and the Operation Classification listed as 5    "authorized for hire", "exempt for hire", or both 6    "authorized for hire" and "exempt for hire"; except that 7    this paragraph (2) does not apply to a motor vehicle or 8    trailer used at an airport to support the operation of an 9    aircraft moving in interstate commerce, as long as (i) in 10    the case of a motor vehicle, the motor vehicle meets 11    paragraphs (1) and (3) of this subsection (d-5) or (ii) in 12    the case of a trailer, the trailer meets paragraph (1) of 13    this subsection (d-5); and14        (3) for motor vehicles, the gross vehicle weight 15    rating exceeds 16,000 pounds.16    The definition of "use as rolling stock moving in 17interstate commerce" in this subsection (d-5) applies to all 18property purchased on or after July 1, 2017 for the purpose of 19being attached to a motor vehicle or trailer as a part thereof, 20regardless of whether the motor vehicle or trailer was 21purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017.22    If an item ceases to meet requirements (1) through (3) 23under this subsection (d-5), then the tax is imposed on the 24selling price, allowing for a reasonable depreciation for the 25period during which the item qualified for the exemption.26    For purposes of this subsection (d-5):  SB2027- 23 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1        "Motor vehicle" excludes limousines, but otherwise 2    means that term as defined in Section 1-146 of the 3    Illinois Vehicle Code.4        "Trailer" means (i) "trailer", as defined in Section 5    1-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, (ii) "semitrailer", as 6    defined in Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and 7    (iii) "pole trailer", as defined in Section 1-161 of the 8    Illinois Vehicle Code. 9    (e) For aircraft and watercraft purchased on or after 10January 1, 2014, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate 11commerce" in (i) paragraph (4a) of the definition of "sale of 12service" in Section 2 and (ii) subsection (b) of Section 3-45 13occurs when, during a 12-month period, the rolling stock has 14carried persons or property for hire in interstate commerce 15for greater than 50% of its total trips for that period or for 16greater than 50% of its total miles for that period. The person 17claiming the exemption shall make an election at the time of 18purchase to use either the trips or mileage method and 19document that election in their books and records. If no 20election is made under this subsection to use the trips or 21mileage method, the person shall be deemed to have chosen the 22mileage method. For aircraft, flight hours may be used in lieu 23of recording miles in determining whether the aircraft meets 24the mileage test in this subsection. For watercraft, nautical 25miles or trip hours may be used in lieu of recording miles in 26determining whether the watercraft meets the mileage test in   SB2027- 24 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1this subsection.2    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 3contrary, property purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for 4the purpose of being attached to aircraft or watercraft as a 5part thereof qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 6commerce only if the aircraft or watercraft to which it will be 7attached qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 8commerce under the test set forth in this subsection (e), 9regardless of when the aircraft or watercraft was purchased. 10Persons who purchased aircraft or watercraft prior to January 111, 2014 shall make an election to use either the trips or 12mileage method and document that election in their books and 13records for the purpose of determining whether property 14purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for the purpose of being 15attached to aircraft or watercraft as a part thereof qualifies 16as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under this 17subsection (e). 18    (f) The election to use either the trips or mileage method 19made under the provisions of subsections (c), (d), or (e) of 20this Section will remain in effect for the duration of the 21purchaser's ownership of that item. 22(Source: P.A. 100-321, eff. 8-24-17.) 23    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 24changing Section 2d as follows:   SB2027- 25 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    (35 ILCS 115/2d)2    Sec. 2d. Motor vehicles; trailers; use as rolling stock 3definition. 4    (a) (Blank). 5    (b) (Blank).6    (c) This subsection (c) applies to motor vehicles, other 7than limousines, purchased through June 30, 2017. For motor 8vehicles, other than limousines, purchased on or after July 1, 92017, subsection (d-5) applies. This subsection (c) applies to 10limousines purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017. "Use 11as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph 12(d-1) of the definition of "sale of service" in Section 2 13occurs for motor vehicles, as defined in Section 1-146 of the 14Illinois Vehicle Code, when during a 12-month period the 15rolling stock has carried persons or property for hire in 16interstate commerce for greater than 50% of its total trips 17for that period or for greater than 50% of its total miles for 18that period. The person claiming the exemption shall make an 19election at the time of purchase to use either the trips or 20mileage method. Persons who purchased motor vehicles prior to 21July 1, 2004 shall make an election to use either the trips or 22mileage method and document that election in their books and 23records. If no election is made under this subsection to use 24the trips or mileage method, the person shall be deemed to have 25chosen the mileage method.26    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles,   SB2027- 26 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1motor vehicles that carry persons or property for hire, even 2just between points in Illinois, will be considered used for 3hire in interstate commerce if the motor vehicle transports 4persons whose journeys or property whose shipments originate 5or terminate outside Illinois. The exemption for motor 6vehicles used as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 7may be claimed only for the following vehicles: (i) motor 8vehicles whose gross vehicle weight rating exceeds 16,000 9pounds; and (ii) limousines, as defined in Section 1-139.1 of 10the Illinois Vehicle Code. On and after July 1, 2025, the 11exemption for limousines applies only to limousines that are 12not subject to the provisions of the Transportation Network 13Providers Act. Through June 30, 2017, this definition applies 14to all property purchased for the purpose of being attached to 15those motor vehicles as a part thereof. On and after July 1, 162017, this definition applies to property purchased for the 17purpose of being attached to limousines as a part thereof. 18With respect to property that is transferred incident to a 19sale of service on or after July 1, 2025 for the purpose of 20being attached to limousines as a part thereof, this 21definition applies only if the limousine is not subject to the 22provisions of the Transportation Network Providers Act. 23    (d) For purchases made through June 30, 2017, "use as 24rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph 25(d-1) of the definition of "sale of service" in Section 2 26occurs for trailers, as defined in Section 1-209 of the   SB2027- 27 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1Illinois Vehicle Code, semitrailers as defined in Section 21-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and pole trailers as 3defined in Section 1-161 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when 4during a 12-month period the rolling stock has carried persons 5or property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 650% of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% 7of its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 8exemption for a trailer or trailers that will not be dedicated 9to a motor vehicle or group of motor vehicles shall make an 10election at the time of purchase to use either the trips or 11mileage method. Persons who purchased trailers prior to July 121, 2004 that are not dedicated to a motor vehicle or group of 13motor vehicles shall make an election to use either the trips 14or mileage method and document that election in their books 15and records. If no election is made under this subsection to 16use the trips or mileage method, the person shall be deemed to 17have chosen the mileage method.18    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 19trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that carry property 20for hire, even just between points in Illinois, will be 21considered used for hire in interstate commerce if the 22trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers transport property 23whose shipments originate or terminate outside Illinois. This 24definition applies to all property purchased for the purpose 25of being attached to those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 26trailers as a part thereof. In lieu of a person providing   SB2027- 28 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1documentation regarding the qualifying use of each individual 2trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, that person may 3document such qualifying use by providing documentation of the 4following:5        (1) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 6    dedicated to a motor vehicle that qualifies as rolling 7    stock moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) 8    of this Section, then that trailer, semitrailer, or pole 9    trailer qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 10    commerce under this subsection.11        (2) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 12    dedicated to a group of motor vehicles that all qualify as 13    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 14    subsection (c) of this Section, then that trailer, 15    semitrailer, or pole trailer qualifies as rolling stock 16    moving in interstate commerce under this subsection.17        (3) If one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 18    trailers are dedicated to a group of motor vehicles and 19    not all of those motor vehicles in that group qualify as 20    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 21    subsection (c) of this Section, then the percentage of 22    those trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that 23    qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 24    under this subsection is equal to the percentage of those 25    motor vehicles in that group that qualify as rolling stock 26    moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) of this   SB2027- 29 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    Section to which those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 2    trailers are dedicated. However, to determine the 3    qualification for the exemption provided under this item 4    (3), the mathematical application of the qualifying 5    percentage to one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 6    trailers under this subpart shall not be allowed as to any 7    fraction of a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer. 8    (d-5) For motor vehicles and trailers purchased on or 9after July 1, 2017, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate 10commerce" means that:11        (1) the motor vehicle or trailer is used to transport 12    persons or property for hire;13        (2) for purposes of the exemption under paragraph 14    (d-1) of the definition of "sale of service" in Section 2, 15    the purchaser who is an owner, lessor, or shipper claiming 16    the exemption certifies that the motor vehicle or trailer 17    will be utilized, from the time of purchase and continuing 18    through the statute of limitations for issuing a notice of 19    tax liability under this Act, by an interstate carrier or 20    carriers for hire who hold, and are required by Federal 21    Motor Carrier Safety Administration regulations to hold, 22    an active USDOT Number with the Carrier Operation listed 23    as "Interstate" and the Operation Classification listed as 24    "authorized for hire", "exempt for hire", or both 25    "authorized for hire" and "exempt for hire"; except that 26    this paragraph (2) does not apply to a motor vehicle or   SB2027- 30 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    trailer used at an airport to support the operation of an 2    aircraft moving in interstate commerce, as long as (i) in 3    the case of a motor vehicle, the motor vehicle meets 4    paragraphs (1) and (3) of this subsection (d-5) or (ii) in 5    the case of a trailer, the trailer meets paragraph (1) of 6    this subsection (d-5); and7        (3) for motor vehicles, the gross vehicle weight 8    rating exceeds 16,000 pounds.9    The definition of "use as rolling stock moving in 10interstate commerce" in this subsection (d-5) applies to all 11property purchased on or after July 1, 2017 for the purpose of 12being attached to a motor vehicle or trailer as a part thereof, 13regardless of whether the motor vehicle or trailer was 14purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017.15    If an item ceases to meet requirements (1) through (3) 16under this subsection (d-5), then the tax is imposed on the 17selling price, allowing for a reasonable depreciation for the 18period during which the item qualified for the exemption.19    For purposes of this subsection (d-5):20        "Motor vehicle" excludes limousines, but otherwise 21    means that term as defined in Section 1-146 of the 22    Illinois Vehicle Code.23        "Trailer" means (i) "trailer", as defined in Section 24    1-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, (ii) "semitrailer", as 25    defined in Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and 26    (iii) "pole trailer", as defined in Section 1-161 of the   SB2027- 31 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    Illinois Vehicle Code. 2    (e) For aircraft and watercraft purchased on or after 3January 1, 2014, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate 4commerce" in paragraph (d-1) of the definition of "sale of 5service" in Section 2 occurs when, during a 12-month period, 6the rolling stock has carried persons or property for hire in 7interstate commerce for greater than 50% of its total trips 8for that period or for greater than 50% of its total miles for 9that period. The person claiming the exemption shall make an 10election at the time of purchase to use either the trips or 11mileage method and document that election in their books and 12records. If no election is made under this subsection to use 13the trips or mileage method, the person shall be deemed to have 14chosen the mileage method. For aircraft, flight hours may be 15used in lieu of recording miles in determining whether the 16aircraft meets the mileage test in this subsection. For 17watercraft, nautical miles or trip hours may be used in lieu of 18recording miles in determining whether the watercraft meets 19the mileage test in this subsection.20    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 21contrary, property purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for 22the purpose of being attached to aircraft or watercraft as a 23part thereof qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 24commerce only if the aircraft or watercraft to which it will be 25attached qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 26commerce under the test set forth in this subsection (e),   SB2027- 32 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1regardless of when the aircraft or watercraft was purchased. 2Persons who purchased aircraft or watercraft prior to January 31, 2014 shall make an election to use either the trips or 4mileage method and document that election in their books and 5records for the purpose of determining whether property 6purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for the purpose of being 7attached to aircraft or watercraft as a part thereof qualifies 8as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under this 9subsection (e). 10    (f) The election to use either the trips or mileage method 11made under the provisions of subsections (c), (d), or (e) of 12this Section will remain in effect for the duration of the 13purchaser's ownership of that item. 14(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 15    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 16by changing Sections 2-5 and 2-51 as follows: 17    (35 ILCS 120/2-5)18    Sec. 2-5. Exemptions. Gross receipts from proceeds from 19the sale, which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes the 20lease, of the following tangible personal property are exempt 21from the tax imposed by this Act:22        (1) Farm chemicals.23        (2) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 24    including that manufactured on special order, certified by   SB2027- 33 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    the purchaser to be used primarily for production 2    agriculture or State or federal agricultural programs, 3    including individual replacement parts for the machinery 4    and equipment, including machinery and equipment purchased 5    for lease, and including implements of husbandry defined 6    in Section 1-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, farm 7    machinery and agricultural chemical and fertilizer 8    spreaders, and nurse wagons required to be registered 9    under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, but 10    excluding other motor vehicles required to be registered 11    under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural polyhouses 12    or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 13    overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery 14    and equipment under this item (2). Agricultural chemical 15    tender tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold 16    separately from a motor vehicle required to be licensed 17    and units sold mounted on a motor vehicle required to be 18    licensed, if the selling price of the tender is separately 19    stated.20        Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 21    farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 22    installed on farm machinery and equipment including, but 23    not limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, 24    seeders, or spreaders. Precision farming equipment 25    includes, but is not limited to, soil testing sensors, 26    computers, monitors, software, global positioning and   SB2027- 34 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    mapping systems, and other such equipment.2        Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 3    sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in 4    the computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 5    facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not 6    limited to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of 7    animal and crop data for the purpose of formulating animal 8    diets and agricultural chemicals. 9        Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and 10    equipment also includes electrical power generation 11    equipment used primarily for production agriculture. 12        This item (2) is exempt from the provisions of Section 13    2-70.14        (3) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 15    equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed 16    by the retailer, certified by the user to be used only for 17    the production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for 18    consumption as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel 19    for the personal use of the user, and not subject to sale 20    or resale.21        (4) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again September 22    1, 2004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery 23    and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, 24    both new and used, and including that manufactured on 25    special order or purchased for lease, certified by the 26    purchaser to be used primarily for graphic arts   SB2027- 35 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    production. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 2    acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 3    acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change 4    upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, 5    graphic arts machinery and equipment is included in the 6    manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 7    exemption under paragraph (14).8        (5) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile 9    renting, as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation 10    and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 11    provisions of Section 2-70.12        (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored 13    student organization affiliated with an elementary or 14    secondary school located in Illinois.15        (7) Until July 1, 2003, proceeds of that portion of 16    the selling price of a passenger car the sale of which is 17    subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.18        (8) Personal property sold to an Illinois county fair 19    association for use in conducting, operating, or promoting 20    the county fair.21        (9) Personal property sold to a not-for-profit arts or 22    cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 23    by the Department by rule, that it has received an 24    exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 25    Code and that is organized and operated primarily for the 26    presentation or support of arts or cultural programming,   SB2027- 36 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    activities, or services. These organizations include, but 2    are not limited to, music and dramatic arts organizations 3    such as symphony orchestras and theatrical groups, arts 4    and cultural service organizations, local arts councils, 5    visual arts organizations, and media arts organizations. 6    On and after July 1, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 7    92-35), however, an entity otherwise eligible for this 8    exemption shall not make tax-free purchases unless it has 9    an active identification number issued by the Department.10        (10) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 11    association, foundation, institution, or organization, 12    other than a limited liability company, that is organized 13    and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for 14    the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 15    personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for 16    the purpose of resale by the enterprise.17        (11) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 18    personal property sold to a governmental body, to a 19    corporation, society, association, foundation, or 20    institution organized and operated exclusively for 21    charitable, religious, or educational purposes, or to a 22    not-for-profit corporation, society, association, 23    foundation, institution, or organization that has no 24    compensated officers or employees and that is organized 25    and operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 26    years of age or older. A limited liability company may   SB2027- 37 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    qualify for the exemption under this paragraph only if the 2    limited liability company is organized and operated 3    exclusively for educational purposes. On and after July 1, 4    1987, however, no entity otherwise eligible for this 5    exemption shall make tax-free purchases unless it has an 6    active identification number issued by the Department.7        (12) (Blank).8        (12-5) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 9    2004, motor vehicles of the second division with a gross 10    vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds that are subject 11    to the commercial distribution fee imposed under Section 12    3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on July 1, 13    2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State of 14    motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 15    vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that 16    are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed 17    under Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and 18    (iii) that are primarily used for commercial purposes. 19    Through June 30, 2005, this exemption applies to repair 20    and replacement parts added after the initial purchase of 21    such a motor vehicle if that motor vehicle is used in a 22    manner that would qualify for the rolling stock exemption 23    otherwise provided for in this Act. For purposes of this 24    paragraph, "used for commercial purposes" means the 25    transportation of persons or property in furtherance of 26    any commercial or industrial enterprise whether for-hire   SB2027- 38 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    or not. 2        (13) Proceeds from sales to owners or lessors, 3    lessees, or shippers of tangible personal property that is 4    utilized by interstate carriers for hire for use as 5    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce and equipment 6    operated by a telecommunications provider, licensed as a 7    common carrier by the Federal Communications Commission, 8    which is permanently installed in or affixed to aircraft 9    moving in interstate commerce.10        (14) Machinery and equipment that will be used by the 11    purchaser, or a lessee of the purchaser, primarily in the 12    process of manufacturing or assembling tangible personal 13    property for wholesale or retail sale or lease, whether 14    the sale or lease is made directly by the manufacturer or 15    by some other person, whether the materials used in the 16    process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 17    person, or whether the sale or lease is made apart from or 18    as an incident to the seller's engaging in the service 19    occupation of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, 20    patterns, gauges, or other similar items of no commercial 21    value on special order for a particular purchaser. The 22    exemption provided by this paragraph (14) does not include 23    machinery and equipment used in (i) the generation of 24    electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) the 25    generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 26    wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers   SB2027- 39 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment 2    of water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 3    customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The 4    provisions of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of 5    existing law as to the meaning and scope of this 6    exemption. Beginning on July 1, 2017, the exemption 7    provided by this paragraph (14) includes, but is not 8    limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, as 9    defined in paragraph (4) of this Section.10        (15) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 11    stated on customers' bills for purchase and consumption of 12    food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 13    service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 14    substitute for tips to the employees who participate 15    directly in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the 16    food or beverage function with respect to which the 17    service charge is imposed. 18        (16) Tangible personal property sold to a purchaser if 19    the purchaser is exempt from use tax by operation of 20    federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 21    of Section 2-70. 22        (17) Tangible personal property sold to a common 23    carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 24    possession of the property in Illinois and that transports 25    the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 26    transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a   SB2027- 40 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    standard uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the 2    property as the shipper or consignor of the property to a 3    destination outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.4        (18) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or 5    silver coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the 6    government of the United States of America, or the 7    government of any foreign country, and bullion.8        (19) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, 9    drilling, and production equipment, including (i) rigs and 10    parts of rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover 11    rigs, (ii) pipe and tubular goods, including casing and 12    drill strings, (iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) 13    storage tanks and flow lines, (v) any individual 14    replacement part for oil field exploration, drilling, and 15    production equipment, and (vi) machinery and equipment 16    purchased for lease; but excluding motor vehicles required 17    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code.18        (20) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, 19    including repair and replacement parts, both new and used, 20    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 21    the purchaser to be used primarily for photoprocessing, 22    and including photoprocessing machinery and equipment 23    purchased for lease.24        (21) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate 25    exploration, mining, off-highway hauling, processing, 26    maintenance, and reclamation equipment, including   SB2027- 41 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    replacement parts and equipment, and including equipment 2    purchased for lease, but excluding motor vehicles required 3    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 4    changes made to this Section by Public Act 97-767 apply on 5    and after July 1, 2003, but no claim for credit or refund 6    is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 (the effective date 7    of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid during the 8    period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 16, 9    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).10        (22) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 11    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 12    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 13    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 14    flight destined for or returning from a location or 15    locations outside the United States without regard to 16    previous or subsequent domestic stopovers.17        Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 18    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 19    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 20    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 21    flight that (i) is engaged in foreign trade or is engaged 22    in trade between the United States and any of its 23    possessions and (ii) transports at least one individual or 24    package for hire from the city of origination to the city 25    of final destination on the same aircraft, without regard 26    to a change in the flight number of that aircraft.   SB2027- 42 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1        (23) A transaction in which the purchase order is 2    received by a florist who is located outside Illinois, but 3    who has a florist located in Illinois deliver the property 4    to the purchaser or the purchaser's donee in Illinois.5        (24) Fuel consumed or used in the operation of ships, 6    barges, or vessels that are used primarily in or for the 7    transportation of property or the conveyance of persons 8    for hire on rivers bordering on this State if the fuel is 9    delivered by the seller to the purchaser's barge, ship, or 10    vessel while it is afloat upon that bordering river.11        (25) Except as provided in items item (25-5) and 12    (25-6) of this Section, a motor vehicle sold in this State 13    to a nonresident even though the motor vehicle is 14    delivered to the nonresident in this State, if the motor 15    vehicle is not to be titled in this State, and if a 16    drive-away permit is issued to the motor vehicle as 17    provided in Section 3-603 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or 18    if the nonresident purchaser has vehicle registration 19    plates to transfer to the motor vehicle upon returning to 20    his or her home state. The issuance of the drive-away 21    permit or having the out-of-state registration plates to 22    be transferred is prima facie evidence that the motor 23    vehicle will not be titled in this State.24        (25-5) The exemption under item (25) does not apply if 25    the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does 26    not allow a reciprocal exemption for a motor vehicle sold   SB2027- 43 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    and delivered in that state to an Illinois resident but 2    titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this Act on 3    the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident of 4    another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption 5    shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax 6    on taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is 7    a resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax 8    that would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the 9    time of the sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, 10    signed under penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to 11    title the vehicle in the state in which the purchaser is a 12    resident within 30 days after the sale and of the fact of 13    the payment to the State of Illinois of tax in an amount 14    equivalent to the state's rate of tax on taxable property 15    in his or her state of residence and shall submit the 16    statement to the appropriate tax collection agency in his 17    or her state of residence. In addition, the retailer must 18    retain a signed copy of the statement in his or her 19    records. Nothing in this item shall be construed to 20    require the removal of the vehicle from this state 21    following the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in 22    the purchaser's state of residence if the purchaser titles 23    the vehicle in his or her state of residence within 30 days 24    after the date of sale. The tax collected under this Act in 25    accordance with this item (25-5) shall be proportionately 26    distributed as if the tax were collected at the 6.25%   SB2027- 44 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    general rate imposed under this Act. 2        (25-6) There is a rebuttable presumption that the 3    exemption under item (25) does not apply if the purchaser 4    is a limited liability company and a member of the limited 5    liability company is a resident of Illinois. This 6    presumption may be rebutted by other evidence, such as 7    evidence the motor vehicle is insured at a garaging or 8    storage address outside Illinois or other evidence of the 9    physical address at which the motor vehicle will be stored 10    or garaged outside Illinois. 11        (25-7) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed 12    under this Act on the sale of an aircraft, as defined in 13    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 14    following conditions are met:15            (1) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 16        after the later of either the issuance of the final 17        billing for the sale of the aircraft, or the 18        authorized approval for return to service, completion 19        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 20        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 21        required by 14 CFR 91.407;22            (2) the aircraft is not based or registered in 23        this State after the sale of the aircraft; and24            (3) the seller retains in his or her books and 25        records and provides to the Department a signed and 26        dated certification from the purchaser, on a form   SB2027- 45 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1        prescribed by the Department, certifying that the 2        requirements of this item (25-7) are met. The 3        certificate must also include the name and address of 4        the purchaser, the address of the location where the 5        aircraft is to be titled or registered, the address of 6        the primary physical location of the aircraft, and 7        other information that the Department may reasonably 8        require.9        For purposes of this item (25-7):10        "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or 11    otherwise used, excluding post-sale customizations as 12    defined in this Section, for 10 or more days in each 13    12-month period immediately following the date of the sale 14    of the aircraft.15        "Registered in this State" means an aircraft 16    registered with the Department of Transportation, 17    Aeronautics Division, or titled or registered with the 18    Federal Aviation Administration to an address located in 19    this State.20        This paragraph (25-7) is exempt from the provisions of 21    Section 2-70. 22        (26) Semen used for artificial insemination of 23    livestock for direct agricultural production.24        (27) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with 25    and meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse 26    Club Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American   SB2027- 46 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    Quarter Horse Association, United States Trotting 2    Association, or Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for 3    purposes of breeding or racing for prizes. This item (27) 4    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70, and the 5    exemption provided for under this item (27) applies for 6    all periods beginning May 30, 1995, but no claim for 7    credit or refund is allowed on or after January 1, 2008 8    (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for such taxes 9    paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and ending 10    on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 11    95-88).12        (28) Computers and communications equipment utilized 13    for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 14    diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 15    sold to a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of 16    one year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 17    purchase, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax 18    exemption identification number by the Department under 19    Section 1g of this Act.20        (29) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 21    property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 22    in effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental 23    body that has been issued an active tax exemption 24    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 25    of this Act.26        (30) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after   SB2027- 47 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 2    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 3    donated for disaster relief to be used in a State or 4    federally declared disaster area in Illinois or bordering 5    Illinois by a manufacturer or retailer that is registered 6    in this State to a corporation, society, association, 7    foundation, or institution that has been issued a sales 8    tax exemption identification number by the Department that 9    assists victims of the disaster who reside within the 10    declared disaster area.11        (31) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 12    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 13    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 14    used in the performance of infrastructure repairs in this 15    State, including, but not limited to, municipal roads and 16    streets, access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal 17    systems, water and sewer line extensions, water 18    distribution and purification facilities, storm water 19    drainage and retention facilities, and sewage treatment 20    facilities, resulting from a State or federally declared 21    disaster in Illinois or bordering Illinois when such 22    repairs are initiated on facilities located in the 23    declared disaster area within 6 months after the disaster.24        (32) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold 25    at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that 26    term is used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is   SB2027- 48 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.2        (33) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in 3    Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is 4    donated to a corporation, limited liability company, 5    society, association, foundation, or institution that is 6    determined by the Department to be organized and operated 7    exclusively for educational purposes. For purposes of this 8    exemption, "a corporation, limited liability company, 9    society, association, foundation, or institution organized 10    and operated exclusively for educational purposes" means 11    all tax-supported public schools, private schools that 12    offer systematic instruction in useful branches of 13    learning by methods common to public schools and that 14    compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 15    course of study presented in tax-supported schools, and 16    vocational or technical schools or institutes organized 17    and operated exclusively to provide a course of study of 18    not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 19    individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 20    technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 21    occupation.22        (34) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 23    including food, purchased through fundraising events for 24    the benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary 25    school, a group of those schools, or one or more school 26    districts if the events are sponsored by an entity   SB2027- 49 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    recognized by the school district that consists primarily 2    of volunteers and includes parents and teachers of the 3    school children. This paragraph does not apply to 4    fundraising events (i) for the benefit of private home 5    instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising entity 6    purchases the personal property sold at the events from 7    another individual or entity that sold the property for 8    the purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that 9    profits from the sale to the fundraising entity. This 10    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.11        (35) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 12    31, 2001, new or used automatic vending machines that 13    prepare and serve hot food and beverages, including 14    coffee, soup, and other items, and replacement parts for 15    these machines. Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 16    30, 2003, machines and parts for machines used in 17    commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending business 18    if a use or occupation tax is paid on the gross receipts 19    derived from the use of the commercial, coin-operated 20    amusement and vending machines. This paragraph is exempt 21    from the provisions of Section 2-70.22        (35-5) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 23    2016, food for human consumption that is to be consumed 24    off the premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic 25    beverages, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared 26    for immediate consumption) and prescription and   SB2027- 50 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, and 2    insulin, urine testing materials, syringes, and needles 3    used by diabetics, for human use, when purchased for use 4    by a person receiving medical assistance under Article V 5    of the Illinois Public Aid Code who resides in a licensed 6    long-term care facility, as defined in the Nursing Home 7    Care Act, or a licensed facility as defined in the ID/DD 8    Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized 9    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.10        (36) Beginning August 2, 2001, computers and 11    communications equipment utilized for any hospital purpose 12    and equipment used in the diagnosis, analysis, or 13    treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor who leases 14    the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 15    executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 16    hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 17    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 18    of this Act. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 19    of Section 2-70.20        (37) Beginning August 2, 2001, personal property sold 21    to a lessor who leases the property, under a lease of one 22    year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 23    purchase, to a governmental body that has been issued an 24    active tax exemption identification number by the 25    Department under Section 1g of this Act. This paragraph is 26    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.  SB2027- 51 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1        (38) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2    2016, tangible personal property purchased from an 3    Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 4    purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt 5    of the property in Illinois, temporarily store the 6    property in Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently 7    transporting it outside this State for use or consumption 8    thereafter solely outside this State or (ii) for the 9    purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured 10    into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible 11    personal property to be transported outside this State and 12    thereafter used or consumed solely outside this State. The 13    Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules adopted in 14    accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 15    issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing with the 16    Department who is eligible for the exemption under this 17    paragraph (38). The permit issued under this paragraph 18    (38) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 19    manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 20    purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 21    from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall 22    maintain all necessary books and records to substantiate 23    the use and consumption of all such tangible personal 24    property outside of the State of Illinois.25        (39) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal 26    property used in the construction or maintenance of a   SB2027- 52 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    community water supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of 2    the Environmental Protection Act, that is operated by a 3    not-for-profit corporation that holds a valid water supply 4    permit issued under Title IV of the Environmental 5    Protection Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 6    provisions of Section 2-70. 7        (40) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 8    December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, 9    components, and furnishings incorporated into or upon an 10    aircraft as part of the modification, refurbishment, 11    completion, replacement, repair, or maintenance of the 12    aircraft. This exemption includes consumable supplies used 13    in the modification, refurbishment, completion, 14    replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft. However, 15    until January 1, 2024, this exemption excludes any 16    materials, parts, equipment, components, and consumable 17    supplies used in the modification, replacement, repair, 18    and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants, 19    whether such engines or power plants are installed or 20    uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable supplies" 21    include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 22    sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 23    latex gloves, and protective films. 24        Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 25    December 31, 2023, this exemption applies only to the sale 26    of qualifying tangible personal property to persons who   SB2027- 53 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    modify, refurbish, complete, replace, or maintain an 2    aircraft and who (i) hold an Air Agency Certificate and 3    are empowered to operate an approved repair station by the 4    Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a Class IV 5    Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance with 6    Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The 7    exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 8    commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 9    service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or 10    Part 129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 11    1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies 12    only to the sale of qualifying tangible personal property 13    to: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, complete, repair, 14    replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) hold an Air 15    Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 16    approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 17    Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) 18    conduct operations in accordance with Part 145 of the 19    Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) persons who engage 20    in the modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance 21    of aircraft engines or power plants without regard to 22    whether or not those persons meet the qualifications of 23    item (A).24        The changes made to this paragraph (40) by Public Act 25    98-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent 26    of the General Assembly that the exemption under this   SB2027- 54 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    paragraph (40) applies continuously from January 1, 2010 2    through December 31, 2024; however, no claim for credit or 3    refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of the 4    disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 5    and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of 6    Public Act 101-629).7        (41) Tangible personal property sold to a 8    public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 9    11-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 10    constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, 11    but only if the legal title to the municipal convention 12    hall is transferred to the municipality without any 13    further consideration by or on behalf of the municipality 14    at the time of the completion of the municipal convention 15    hall or upon the retirement or redemption of any bonds or 16    other debt instruments issued by the public-facilities 17    corporation in connection with the development of the 18    municipal convention hall. This exemption includes 19    existing public-facilities corporations as provided in 20    Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois Municipal Code. This 21    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 22        (42) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 23    31, 2026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 24        (43) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental 25    Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser 26    must certify that the item is purchased to be rented   SB2027- 55 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    subject to a rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the 2    Rental-Purchase Agreement Act, and provide proof of 3    registration under the Rental Purchase Agreement 4    Occupation and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from 5    the provisions of Section 2-70.6        (44) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 7    construction or operation of a data center that has been 8    granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 9    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 10    personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 11    tenant of the data center or by a contractor or 12    subcontractor of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data 13    centers that would have qualified for a certificate of 14    exemption prior to January 1, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 15    been in effect, may apply for and obtain an exemption for 16    subsequent purchases of computer equipment or enabling 17    software purchased or leased to upgrade, supplement, or 18    replace computer equipment or enabling software purchased 19    or leased in the original investment that would have 20    qualified. 21        The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 22    shall grant a certificate of exemption under this item 23    (44) to qualified data centers as defined by Section 24    605-1025 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 25    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 26    Illinois.   SB2027- 56 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1        For the purposes of this item (44): 2            "Data center" means a building or a series of 3        buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house 4        working servers in one physical location or multiple 5        sites within the State of Illinois. 6            "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 7        electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 8        chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 9        equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 10        generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 11        devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; 12        cabinets; telecommunications cabling infrastructure; 13        raised floor systems; peripheral components or 14        systems; software; mechanical, electrical, or plumbing 15        systems; battery systems; cooling systems and towers; 16        temperature control systems; other cabling; and other 17        data center infrastructure equipment and systems 18        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 19        property, including fixtures; and component parts of 20        any of the foregoing, including installation, 21        maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and replacement of 22        qualified tangible personal property to generate, 23        transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity 24        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 25        property; and all other tangible personal property 26        that is essential to the operations of a computer data   SB2027- 57 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1        center. The term "qualified tangible personal 2        property" also includes building materials physically 3        incorporated into the qualifying data center. To 4        document the exemption allowed under this Section, the 5        retailer must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the 6        certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of 7        Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 8        This item (44) is exempt from the provisions of 9    Section 2-70. 10        (45) Beginning January 1, 2020 and through December 11    31, 2020, sales of tangible personal property made by a 12    marketplace seller over a marketplace for which tax is due 13    under this Act but for which use tax has been collected and 14    remitted to the Department by a marketplace facilitator 15    under Section 2d of the Use Tax Act are exempt from tax 16    under this Act. A marketplace seller claiming this 17    exemption shall maintain books and records demonstrating 18    that the use tax on such sales has been collected and 19    remitted by a marketplace facilitator. Marketplace sellers 20    that have properly remitted tax under this Act on such 21    sales may file a claim for credit as provided in Section 6 22    of this Act. No claim is allowed, however, for such taxes 23    for which a credit or refund has been issued to the 24    marketplace facilitator under the Use Tax Act, or for 25    which the marketplace facilitator has filed a claim for 26    credit or refund under the Use Tax Act.   SB2027- 58 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1        (46) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 2    collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. 3    This item (46) is exempt from the provisions of Section 4    2-70. As used in this item (46): 5        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 6    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 7    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 8    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 9    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 10    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 11    time of sale. 12        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 13    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 14    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 15    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 16    milk until it is ready for consumption. 17        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 18    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 19    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 20    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 21    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 22    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 23    milk storage bags. 24        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 25    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 26    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags   SB2027- 59 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 2    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 3    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 4    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 5    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 6    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 7    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 8    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 9    or distributor. 10        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 11    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 12    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 13    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 14    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 15    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 16    manufacturer or distributor. 17        (47) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf 18    of the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform 19    Unclaimed Property Act. This item (47) is exempt from the 20    provisions of Section 2-70. 21        (48) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 22    property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 23    forces of the United States who presents valid military 24    identification and purchases the property using a form of 25    payment where the federal government is the payor. The 26    member of the armed forces must complete, at the point of   SB2027- 60 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    sale, a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue 2    documenting that the transaction is eligible for the 3    exemption under this paragraph. Retailers must keep the 4    form as documentation of the exemption in their records 5    for a period of not less than 6 years. "Armed forces of the 6    United States" means the United States Army, Navy, Air 7    Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard. This 8    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 9        (49) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals 10    provided to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment 11    is made by an intermediary, such as a Medicare 12    Administrative Contractor, a Managed Care Organization, or 13    a Medicare Advantage Organization, pursuant to a 14    government contract. This paragraph (49) is exempt from 15    the provisions of Section 2-70. 16        (50) (49) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further 17    defined in Section 2-10, food for human consumption that 18    is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold (other 19    than alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused 20    with adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that 21    has been prepared for immediate consumption). This item 22    (50) (49) is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 23        (51) (49) Gross receipts from the lease of the 24    following tangible personal property:25            (1) computer software transferred subject to a 26        license that meets the following requirements:  SB2027- 61 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1                (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement 2            signed by the licensor and the customer;3                    (i) an electronic agreement in which the 4                customer accepts the license by means of an 5                electronic signature that is verifiable and 6                can be authenticated and is attached to or 7                made part of the license will comply with this 8                requirement;9                    (ii) a license agreement in which the 10                customer electronically accepts the terms by 11                clicking "I agree" does not comply with this 12                requirement;13                (B) it restricts the customer's duplication 14            and use of the software;15                (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 16            sublicensing, or transferring the software to a 17            third party (except to a related party) without 18            the permission and continued control of the 19            licensor;20                (D) the licensor has a policy of providing 21            another copy at minimal or no charge if the 22            customer loses or damages the software, or of 23            permitting the licensee to make and keep an 24            archival copy, and such policy is either stated in 25            the license agreement, supported by the licensor's 26            books and records, or supported by a notarized   SB2027- 62 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1            statement made under penalties of perjury by the 2            licensor; and3                (E) the customer must destroy or return all 4            copies of the software to the licensor at the end 5            of the license period; this provision is deemed to 6            be met, in the case of a perpetual license, 7            without being set forth in the license agreement; 8            and9            (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 10        receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local 11        government if the ordinance imposing that tax was 12        adopted prior to January 1, 2023. 13(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-634, eff. 8-27-21; 14102-700, Article 70, Section 70-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, 15Article 75, Section 75-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-813, eff. 165-13-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, Section 175-20, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-20, eff. 186-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 19eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 20103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 218-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 22    (35 ILCS 120/2-51)23    Sec. 2-51. Motor vehicles; trailers; use as rolling stock 24definition. 25    (a) (Blank).   SB2027- 63 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    (b) (Blank).2    (c) This subsection (c) applies to motor vehicles, other 3than limousines, purchased through June 30, 2017. For motor 4vehicles, other than limousines, purchased on or after July 1, 52017, subsection (d-5) applies. This subsection (c) applies to 6limousines purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017. "Use 7as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph 8(13) of Section 2-5 occurs for motor vehicles, as defined in 9Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when during a 1012-month period the rolling stock has carried persons or 11property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 50% 12of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% of 13its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 14exemption shall make an election at the time of purchase to use 15either the trips or mileage method. Persons who purchased 16motor vehicles prior to July 1, 2004 shall make an election to 17use either the trips or mileage method and document that 18election in their books and records. If no election is made 19under this subsection to use the trips or mileage method, the 20person shall be deemed to have chosen the mileage method.21    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 22motor vehicles that carry persons or property for hire, even 23just between points in Illinois, will be considered used for 24hire in interstate commerce if the motor vehicle transports 25persons whose journeys or property whose shipments originate 26or terminate outside Illinois. The exemption for motor   SB2027- 64 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1vehicles used as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 2may be claimed only for the following vehicles: (i) motor 3vehicles whose gross vehicle weight rating exceeds 16,000 4pounds; and (ii) limousines, as defined in Section 1-139.1 of 5the Illinois Vehicle Code. On and after July 1, 2025, the 6exemption for limousines applies only to limousines that are 7not subject to the provisions of the Transportation Network 8Providers Act. Through June 30, 2017, this definition applies 9to all property purchased for the purpose of being attached to 10those motor vehicles as a part thereof. On and after July 1, 112017, this definition applies to property purchased for the 12purpose of being attached to limousines as a part thereof. For 13property that is purchased on or after July 1, 2025 for the 14purpose of being attached to a limousines as a part thereof, 15this definition applies only if the limousine is not subject 16to the provisions of the Transportation Network Providers Act. 17    (d) For purchases made through June 30, 2017, "use as 18rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph (13) 19of Section 2-5 occurs for trailers, as defined in Section 201-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, semitrailers as defined in 21Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and pole trailers 22as defined in Section 1-161 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when 23during a 12-month period the rolling stock has carried persons 24or property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 2550% of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% 26of its total miles for that period. The person claiming the   SB2027- 65 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1exemption for a trailer or trailers that will not be dedicated 2to a motor vehicle or group of motor vehicles shall make an 3election at the time of purchase to use either the trips or 4mileage method. Persons who purchased trailers prior to July 51, 2004 that are not dedicated to a motor vehicle or group of 6motor vehicles shall make an election to use either the trips 7or mileage method and document that election in their books 8and records. If no election is made under this subsection to 9use the trips or mileage method, the person shall be deemed to 10have chosen the mileage method.11    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 12trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that carry property 13for hire, even just between points in Illinois, will be 14considered used for hire in interstate commerce if the 15trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers transport property 16whose shipments originate or terminate outside Illinois. This 17definition applies to all property purchased for the purpose 18of being attached to those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 19trailers as a part thereof. In lieu of a person providing 20documentation regarding the qualifying use of each individual 21trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, that person may 22document such qualifying use by providing documentation of the 23following:24        (1) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 25    dedicated to a motor vehicle that qualifies as rolling 26    stock moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c)   SB2027- 66 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    of this Section, then that trailer, semitrailer, or pole 2    trailer qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 3    commerce under this subsection.4        (2) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 5    dedicated to a group of motor vehicles that all qualify as 6    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 7    subsection (c) of this Section, then that trailer, 8    semitrailer, or pole trailer qualifies as rolling stock 9    moving in interstate commerce under this subsection.10        (3) If one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 11    trailers are dedicated to a group of motor vehicles and 12    not all of those motor vehicles in that group qualify as 13    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 14    subsection (c) of this Section, then the percentage of 15    those trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that 16    qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 17    under this subsection is equal to the percentage of those 18    motor vehicles in that group that qualify as rolling stock 19    moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) of this 20    Section to which those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 21    trailers are dedicated. However, to determine the 22    qualification for the exemption provided under this item 23    (3), the mathematical application of the qualifying 24    percentage to one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 25    trailers under this subpart shall not be allowed as to any 26    fraction of a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer.   SB2027- 67 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    (d-5) For motor vehicles and trailers purchased on or 2after July 1, 2017, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate 3commerce" means that:4        (1) the motor vehicle or trailer is used to transport 5    persons or property for hire;6        (2) for purposes of the exemption under paragraph (13) 7    of Section 2-5, the purchaser who is an owner, lessor, or 8    shipper claiming the exemption certifies that the motor 9    vehicle or trailer will be utilized, from the time of 10    purchase and continuing through the statute of limitations 11    for issuing a notice of tax liability under this Act, by an 12    interstate carrier or carriers for hire who hold, and are 13    required by Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration 14    regulations to hold, an active USDOT Number with the 15    Carrier Operation listed as "Interstate" and the Operation 16    Classification listed as "authorized for hire", "exempt 17    for hire", or both "authorized for hire" and "exempt for 18    hire"; except that this paragraph (2) does not apply to a 19    motor vehicle or trailer used at an airport to support the 20    operation of an aircraft moving in interstate commerce, as 21    long as (i) in the case of a motor vehicle, the motor 22    vehicle meets paragraphs (1) and (3) of this subsection 23    (d-5) or (ii) in the case of a trailer, the trailer meets 24    paragraph (1) of this subsection (d-5); and25        (3) for motor vehicles, the gross vehicle weight 26    rating exceeds 16,000 pounds.  SB2027- 68 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    The definition of "use as rolling stock moving in 2interstate commerce" in this subsection (d-5) applies to all 3property purchased on or after July 1, 2017 for the purpose of 4being attached to a motor vehicle or trailer as a part thereof, 5regardless of whether the motor vehicle or trailer was 6purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017.7    If an item ceases to meet requirements (1) through (3) 8under this subsection (d-5), then the tax is imposed on the 9selling price, allowing for a reasonable depreciation for the 10period during which the item qualified for the exemption.11    For purposes of this subsection (d-5):12        "Motor vehicle" excludes limousines, but otherwise 13    means that term as defined in Section 1-146 of the 14    Illinois Vehicle Code.15        "Trailer" means (i) "trailer", as defined in Section 16    1-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, (ii) "semitrailer", as 17    defined in Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and 18    (iii) "pole trailer", as defined in Section 1-161 of the 19    Illinois Vehicle Code. 20    (e) For aircraft and watercraft purchased on or after 21January 1, 2014, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate 22commerce" in paragraph (13) of Section 2-5 occurs when, during 23a 12-month period, the rolling stock has carried persons or 24property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 50% 25of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% of 26its total miles for that period. The person claiming the   SB2027- 69 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1exemption shall make an election at the time of purchase to use 2either the trips or mileage method and document that election 3in their books and records. If no election is made under this 4subsection to use the trips or mileage method, the person 5shall be deemed to have chosen the mileage method. For 6aircraft, flight hours may be used in lieu of recording miles 7in determining whether the aircraft meets the mileage test in 8this subsection. For watercraft, nautical miles or trip hours 9may be used in lieu of recording miles in determining whether 10the watercraft meets the mileage test in this subsection.11    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 12contrary, property purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for 13the purpose of being attached to aircraft or watercraft as a 14part thereof qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 15commerce only if the aircraft or watercraft to which it will be 16attached qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 17commerce under the test set forth in this subsection (e), 18regardless of when the aircraft or watercraft was purchased. 19Persons who purchased aircraft or watercraft prior to January 201, 2014 shall make an election to use either the trips or 21mileage method and document that election in their books and 22records for the purpose of determining whether property 23purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for the purpose of being 24attached to aircraft or watercraft as a part thereof qualifies 25as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under this 26subsection (e).   SB2027- 70 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    (f) The election to use either the trips or mileage method 2made under the provisions of subsections (c), (d), or (e) of 3this Section will remain in effect for the duration of the 4purchaser's ownership of that item. 5(Source: P.A. 100-321, eff. 8-24-17.) 6    Section 25. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 7changing Section 3-1001 as follows: 8    (625 ILCS 5/3-1001)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-1001)9    Sec. 3-1001. A tax is hereby imposed on the privilege of 10using, in this State, any motor vehicle as defined in Section 111-146 of this Code acquired by gift, transfer, or purchase, 12and having a year model designation preceding the year of 13application for title by 5 or fewer years prior to October 1, 141985 and 10 or fewer years on and after October 1, 1985 and 15prior to January 1, 1988. On and after January 1, 1988, the tax 16shall apply to all motor vehicles without regard to model 17year. Except that the tax shall not apply: 18        (i) if the use of the motor vehicle is otherwise taxed 19    under the Use Tax Act;20        (ii) if the motor vehicle is bought and used by a 21    governmental agency or a society, association, foundation 22    or institution organized and operated exclusively for 23    charitable, religious or educational purposes;24        (iii) if the use of the motor vehicle is not subject to   SB2027- 71 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    the Use Tax Act by reason of subsection (a), (b), (c), (d), 2    (e) or (f) of Section 3-55 of that Act dealing with the 3    prevention of actual or likely multistate taxation;4        (iv) to implements of husbandry;5        (v) when a junking certificate is issued pursuant to 6    Section 3-117(a) of this Code;7        (vi) when a vehicle is subject to the replacement 8    vehicle tax imposed by Section 3-2001 of this Act;9        (vii) when the transfer is a gift to a beneficiary in 10    the administration of an estate and the beneficiary is a 11    surviving spouse; .12        (viii) if the motor vehicle is purchased for the 13    purpose of resale by a retailer registered under Section 14    2a of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. 15    Prior to January 1, 1988, the rate of tax shall be 5% of 16the selling price for each purchase of a motor vehicle covered 17by Section 3-1001 of this Code. Except as hereinafter 18provided, beginning January 1, 1988 and until January 1, 2022, 19the rate of tax shall be as follows for transactions in which 20the selling price of the motor vehicle is less than $15,000:21Number of Years Transpired AfterApplicable Tax 22Model Year of Motor Vehicle231 or less$390242290253215264165  SB2027- 72 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b151152690378048655950610407over 10258Except as hereinafter provided, beginning January 1, 1988 and 9until January 1, 2022, the rate of tax shall be as follows for 10transactions in which the selling price of the motor vehicle 11is $15,000 or more:12Selling PriceApplicable Tax13$15,000 - $19,999$ 75014$20,000 - $24,999$1,00015$25,000 - $29,999$1,25016$30,000 and over$1,50017    Except as hereinafter provided, beginning on January 1, 182022, the rate of tax shall be as follows for transactions in 19which the selling price of the motor vehicle is less than 20$15,000: 21        (1) if one year or less has transpired after the model 22    year of the vehicle, then the applicable tax is $465; 23        (2) if 2 years have transpired after the model year of 24    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $365; 25        (3) if 3 years have transpired after the model year of 26    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $290;   SB2027- 73 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1        (4) if 4 years have transpired after the model year of 2    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $240; 3        (5) if 5 years have transpired after the model year of 4    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $190; 5        (6) if 6 years have transpired after the model year of 6    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $165; 7        (7) if 7 years have transpired after the model year of 8    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $155; 9        (8) if 8 years have transpired after the model year of 10    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $140; 11        (9) if 9 years have transpired after the model year of 12    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $125; 13        (10) if 10 years have transpired after the model year 14    of the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $115; and 15        (11) if more than 10 years have transpired after the 16    model year of the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax 17    is $100. 18    Except as hereinafter provided, beginning on January 1, 192022, the rate of tax shall be as follows for transactions in 20which the selling price of the motor vehicle is $15,000 or 21more: 22        (1) if the selling price is $15,000 or more, but less 23    than $20,000, then the applicable tax shall be $850; 24        (2) if the selling price is $20,000 or more, but less 25    than $25,000, then the applicable tax shall be $1,100; 26        (3) if the selling price is $25,000 or more, but less   SB2027- 74 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    than $30,000, then the applicable tax shall be $1,350; 2        (4) if the selling price is $30,000 or more, but less 3    than $50,000, then the applicable tax shall be $1,600; 4        (5) if the selling price is $50,000 or more, but less 5    than $100,000, then the applicable tax shall be $2,600; 6        (6) if the selling price is $100,000 or more, but less 7    than $1,000,000, then the applicable tax shall be $5,100; 8    and 9        (7) if the selling price is $1,000,000 or more, then 10    the applicable tax shall be $10,100. 11For the following transactions, the tax rate shall be $15 for 12each motor vehicle acquired in such transaction:13        (i) when the transferee or purchaser is the spouse, 14    mother, father, brother, sister or child of the 15    transferor;16        (ii) when the transfer is a gift to a beneficiary in 17    the administration of an estate, including, but not 18    limited to, the administration of an inter vivos trust 19    that became irrevocable upon the death of a grantor, and 20    the beneficiary is not a surviving spouse;21        (iii) when a motor vehicle which has once been 22    subjected to the Illinois retailers' occupation tax or use 23    tax is transferred in connection with the organization, 24    reorganization, dissolution or partial liquidation of an 25    incorporated or unincorporated business wherein the 26    beneficial ownership is not changed.  SB2027- 75 -LRB104 03451 HLH 13474 b1    A claim that the transaction is taxable under subparagraph 2(i) shall be supported by such proof of family relationship as 3provided by rules of the Department.4    For a transaction in which a motorcycle, motor driven 5cycle or moped is acquired the tax rate shall be $25.6    On and after October 1, 1985 and until January 1, 2022, 71/12 of $5,000,000 of the moneys received by the Department of 8Revenue pursuant to this Section shall be paid each month into 9the Build Illinois Fund; on and after January 1, 2022, 1/12 of 10$40,000,000 of the moneys received by the Department of 11Revenue pursuant to this Section shall be paid each month into 12the Build Illinois Fund; and the remainder shall be paid into 13the General Revenue Fund.14    The tax imposed by this Section shall be abated and no 15longer imposed when the amount deposited to secure the bonds 16issued pursuant to the Build Illinois Bond Act is sufficient 17to provide for the payment of the principal of, and interest 18and premium, if any, on the bonds, as certified to the State 19Comptroller and the Director of Revenue by the Director of the 20Governor's Office of Management and Budget.21(Source: P.A. 102-353, eff. 1-1-22; 102-762, eff. 5-13-22.) 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.